Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5021.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 115.55, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 14. new text end new text begin Best evidence of compliance. new text end new text begin (a) In determining whether a subsurface sewage treatment system meets applicable requirements, the agency, local units of government, and inspectors must use the best evidence that is available for the presence of sewage contaminants in groundwater. For purposes of this subdivision, "best evidence" means results that are less than two years old from any of the following testing methods and sources, with priority given in the order listed: new text end new text begin (1) a measurement of groundwater contaminants by a laboratory accredited by the Department of Health; new text end new text begin (2) continuous, uncompressed probe-measured depth below the drain field base media to the groundwater table; new text end new text begin (3) the National Groundwater Monitoring Network, a watershed district, or historical depth-to-groundwater information of either the network or a watershed district; new text end new text begin (4) empirical field measurements of depth to mottled soil; and new text end new text begin (5) depth to mottled soil with redoximorphic features based on Munsell soil color charts. new text end new text begin (b) The agency, local units of government, or inspector, as applicable, must: new text end new text begin (1) accept results that are less than two years old from any of the testing methods and sources under paragraph (a) when the owner or lessee of the property where a subsurface sewage treatment system is located offers to submit the results; and new text end new text begin (2) notify a person of their rights under this subdivision at least 90 days before issuing a notice of noncompliance. new text end